Washington statutes.
RCW 5.52.020

Notice by telegraph deemed actual notice.

Whenever any notice, information, or intelligence, written or otherwise, is required to be given, the same may be given by telegraph: PROVIDED, That the dispatch containing the same be delivered to the person entitled thereto, or to his or her agent or attorney. Notice by telegraph shall be deemed actual notice.

[ 2011 c 336 s 140; Code 1881 s 2353; 1865 p 74 s 12; RRS s 11346.]